Utah statutes.
70A-2-307.   Delivery in single lot or several lots.
Unless otherwise agreed all goods called for by a contract for sale must be
tendered in a single delivery and payment is due only on such tender but where
the circumstances give either party the right to make or demand delivery in
lots the price if it can be apportioned may be demanded for each lot.
